Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF539.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.3458, subdivision 3, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-00577 609.3458 SEXUAL EXTORTION. Subd. 3. No attempt charge. Notwithstanding section 609.17, no person may be charged with or convicted of an attempt to commit a violation of this section.